Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.46.090

Suit against state trust company or conservator—Where brought—Suit by conservator.

(1) A suit filed against a state trust company or its conservator, after the issuance of an order by the director placing such state trust company in conservatorship and while such order is in effect, shall be brought in the superior court of Thurston county and not elsewhere.

(2) The conservator appointed for such state trust company may file suit in any superior court or other court of competent jurisdiction against any person for the purpose of preserving, protecting, or recovering any asset or property of such state trust company, including claims or causes of action belonging to or which may be asserted by such state trust company.

[ 2019 c 389 s 88.]